Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-8103
Applicability of act.

The Nebraska Protection in Annuity Transactions Act applies to any recommendation
to purchase, exchange, or replace an annuity made to a consumer by
an insurance producer, or an insurer if an insurance producer is not involved,
that results in the recommended purchase, exchange, or replacement.

Laws 2006, LB 875, § 15;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 28;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 23.